Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.520

Mandatory assignment of retirement benefits—Other remedies not limited.

Nothing in RCW 41.50.500 through 41.50.650 limits the use of any and all civil and criminal remedies against an obligor to enforce the obligations of a dissolution order.

[ 1987 c 326 s 3.]